Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2779.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 36, chapter 4, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 36-434.03, to read: START_STATUTE36-434.03. Health insurance; prohibition An outpatient treatment center that provides dialysis services may not steer, direct or advise a patient regarding any health insurance plan or health care coverage option. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Title 44, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding chapter 42, to read: CHAPTER 42 INSURANCE PREMIUM payors ARTICLE 1. GENERAL PROVISIONS START_STATUTE44-8041. Insurance premium payments; nonprofit organizations; notice A. A nonprofit organization that provides assistance with paying or the payment of an individual's health insurance premiums shall provide at least thirty days' notice to the individual before the nonprofit organization discontinues the assistance with paying or the payment of the individual's health insurance premiums. B. The nonprofit organization shall send notification to the address of record on file with the nonprofit organization and by email. END_STATUTE